District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Safe Passage Training and School Engagement Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3023(a) of the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice
Establishment Act of 2011, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code §
1-301.192(a)), is amended by adding new paragraphs (4) and (5) to read as follows:
“(4) Personnel hired by an organization receiving a grant pursuant to this
subsection shall carry out their duties in accordance with the terms of the grant agreement and
standard operating procedures established by the Deputy Mayor, which shall include a
mandatory twice annual meeting between Safe Passage and Safe Blocks personnel (“Safe
Passage Ambassadors”) with the school administrators whose school routes are served by the
Safe Passage Ambassadors.
“(5) All Safe Passage Ambassadors employed by an organization receiving a
grant pursuant to this subsection shall receive the following trainings, at minimum, developed in
consultation with the Office of the State Superintendent for Education and school administrators,
to be administered by the Deputy Mayor:
“(A) Quarterly bystander intervention training, including conflict
resolution and de-escalation techniques;
“(B) Annual cultural competency training, including training on racial,
gender, LGBTQIA+, and socioeconomic factors as related to implicit bias;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(C) Annual training on mental health, neurodivergence, and special needs
for the purpose of providing guidance on how to interact positively with students of different
needs, not to diagnose conditions or administer specific kinds of care;
“(D) Annual training on recognizing signs of abuse, neglect, and domestic,
intimate partner, or intra-familial violence; and
“(E) Any other trainings required by the Deputy Mayor.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3